Rhode Island statutes. Title 21 Food and Drugs
Chapter 31 Rhode Island Food, Drugs, and Cosmetics Act
21-31-15.
Misbranded drug or device.

A drug or device shall be deemed to be misbranded:

If its labeling is false or misleading in any way.

If in package form unless it bears a label containing: (i) the name and place of business of the manufacturer, packer, or distributor; and (ii) an accurate statement of the quantity of the contents in terms of weight, measure, or numerical count; provided, that under paragraph (ii) of this subdivision reasonable variations shall be permitted, and exemptions as to small packages shall be established, by regulations prescribed by the director of health.

If any word, statement, or other information required by or under authority of this chapter to appear on the label or labeling is not prominently placed on it with such conspicuousness (as compared with other words, statements, designs, or devices in the labeling) and in such terms as to render it likely to be read and understood by the ordinary individual under customary conditions of purchase and use.

If it is for use by humans and contains any quantity of the narcotic or hypnotic substance alpha-eucaine, barbituric acid, betaeucaine, bromal, cannabis, carbromal, chloral, coca, cocaine, codeine, heroin, marihuana, morphine, opium, paraldehyde, peyote, or sulphonmethane, or any chemical derivative of any of those substances, which derivative has been by the director of health after investigation found to be, and by regulations under this chapter designated as, habit forming, unless its label bears the name and quantity of the proportion of the substance or derivative and in juxtaposition with it the statement “Warning — May be habit forming.”

If it is a drug and is not designated solely by a name recognized in an official compendium unless its label bears: (i) the common or usual name of the drug, if there is one; and (ii) in case it is fabricated from two (2) or more ingredients, the common or usual name of each active ingredient, including the kind and quantity or proportion of any alcohol, and also including, whether active or not, the name and quantity or proportion of any bromides, ether, chloroform, acetanilid, acetphenetidin, amidopyrine, anti-pyrine, atropine, hysoeine, hyoscyamine, arsenic, digitalis, glucosides, mercury, ouabain, strophanthin, strychnine, thyroid, or any derivative or preparation of those substances contained in it; provided, that to the extent that compliance with the requirements of paragraph (ii) of this subdivision is impracticable, exemptions shall be established by regulations promulgated by the director of health.

Unless its labeling bears: (i) adequate directions for use; and (ii) adequate warnings against use in those pathological conditions or by children where its use may be dangerous to health, or against unsafe dosage or methods or duration of administration or application, in the manner and form that are necessary for the protection of users; provided, that where any requirement of paragraph (i) of this subdivision, as applied to any drug or device, is not necessary for the protection of the public health, the director of health shall promulgate regulations exempting the drug or device from those requirements.

If it purports to be a drug the name of which is recognized in an official compendium, unless it is packaged and labeled as prescribed in the compendium; provided, that the method of packing may be modified with the consent of the director of health. Whenever a drug is recognized in both the United States Pharmacopoeia and the Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia of the United States, it shall be subject to the requirements of the United States Pharmacopoeia with respect to packaging and labeling unless it is labeled and offered for sale as a homeopathic drug, in which case it shall be subject to the provisions of the Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia of the United States, and not to those of the United States Pharmacopoeia.

If it has been found by the director of health to be a drug liable to deterioration, unless it is packaged in the form and manner, and its label bears a statement of the precautions, that the director of health shall by regulations require as necessary for the protection of public health. No regulation shall be established for any drug recognized in an official compendium until the director of health shall have informed the appropriate body charged with the revision of the compendium of the need for packaging or labeling requirements and that body shall have failed within a reasonable time to prescribe those requirements.

If: (i) it is a drug and its container is made, formed, or filled as to be misleading; (ii) it is an imitation of another drug; or (iii) it is offered for sale under the name of another drug.

If it is dangerous to health when used in the dosage, or with the frequency or duration prescribed, recommended, or suggested in its labeling.

A drug intended for use by humans which: (A) is a habit forming drug to which subdivision (a)(4) of this section applies; (B) because of its toxicity or the potential for harmful effect, or the method of its use, or the collateral measures necessary to its use, is not safe for use except under the supervision of a practitioner licensed by law to administer that drug; or (C) is limited by an effective application under §

21-31-16

to use under the professional supervision of a practitioner licensed by law to administer that drug shall be dispensed only: (I) upon a written prescription of a practitioner licensed by law to administer the drug, (II) upon an oral prescription of the practitioner which is reduced promptly to writing and filed by the pharmacist, or (III) by refilling any written or oral prescription if the refilling is authorized by the prescriber either in the original prescription or by oral order which is reduced promptly to writing and filed by the pharmacist. The act of dispensing a drug contrary to the provisions of this subdivision shall be deemed to be an act that results in the drug being misbranded while held for sale.

The director of health may by regulation remove drugs subject to subdivision (a)(4) of this section and §

21-31-16

from the requirements of paragraph (i) of this subdivision when those requirements are not necessary for the protection of the public health.

A drug which is subject to paragraph (i) of this subdivision shall be deemed to be misbranded if at any time prior to dispensing its label fails to bear the statement “Caution: Federal law prohibits dispensing without prescription.” A drug to which paragraph (i) of this subdivision does not apply shall be deemed to be misbranded if at any time prior to dispensing its label bears the caution statement quoted in the preceding sentence.

No prescription for any of the drugs described in this subdivision shall be refilled if marked “non-repeat” or “N.R.”

If it is a drug and its packaging or labeling is in violation of an applicable regulation issued pursuant to §

23-24.1-3

or

23-24.1-4

of the Poison Prevention Packaging Act.

Any drug dispensed by filling or refilling a written or oral prescription of a practitioner licensed by law to prescribe the drug, and any drug dispensed to an ultimate user by a practitioner, shall be exempt from the requirements of this section except subdivisions (a)(1), (9), and (11) of this section, and the packaging requirements of subdivisions (a)(7), (8), and (12) of this section, if the drug bears a label containing the name and address of the dispenser, the serial number and date of the prescription or of its filling, the name of the prescriber, and, if stated in the prescription, the name of the patient, and the directions for use and cautionary statements, if any, contained in the prescription. When a practitioner prescribes a drug by brand name, oral, written or electronic, he or she shall, in each prescription, authorize a less expensive generic equivalent drug product by signing the prescription. Pursuant to §

42-127.1-7

and chapter (19.1 of title 5) an electronic signature shall satisfy this requirement. If in the professional judgment of the prescribing practitioner the brand name is medically necessary, the practitioner shall indicate “Brand name necessary” on the prescription. This exemption shall not apply to any drug dispensed in violation of paragraph (a)(11)(i) of this section.

When dispensing a generic drug product, the word “INTERCHANGE” or the letters “IC” must appear on the label followed by the generic name and manufacturer, and/or distributor, of the chosen product.

The requirements of subdivision (2) of this subsection only apply to single entity, multiple-source drugs.

When dispensing a single entity, single source drug, the trade name of the prescribed drug will also appear on the label, and the generic name of the prescribed drug may also appear on the label.

When dispensing a fixed combination product, the United States Pharmacopoeia’s publication of Pharmacy Equivalent Names (PEN Names) for fixed combination products is the official list of abbreviations for that labeling, and will be the approved abbreviation for identifying the combination product dispensed. If no PEN name has been officially issued by the USP, the practitioner or pharmacist will label the medication secundum artem.

Subdivisions (2) — (5) of this subsection apply in all cases of dispensing by practitioners or pharmacists.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to relieve any person from any requirement prescribed by or under authority of law with respect to drugs now included or which may subsequently be included within the classifications stated in chapters 28 and 30 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 56, § 1; P.L. 1977, ch. 90, § 4; P.L. 1990, ch. 68, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 335, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 110, § 2; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 64; P.L. 2003, ch. 47, § 2; P.L. 2003, ch. 405, § 2.

21-31-16.
Sale of new drugs — Regulations and procedure — Exceptions.

No person shall sell, deliver, offer for sale, hold for sale, or give away any new drug unless: (1) an application with respect to the new drug has become effective under § 505 of the Federal Act, 21 U.S.C. § 355; or (2) when not subject to the Federal Act unless the drug has been tested and has not been found to be unsafe for use under the conditions prescribed, recommended, or suggested in the labeling of it, and prior to selling or offering for sale the drug, there has been filed with the director of health an application setting forth: (i) full reports of investigations which have been made to show whether or not the drug is safe for use; (ii) a full list of the articles used as components of the drug; (iii) a full statement of the composition of the drug; (iv) a full description of the methods used in, and the facilities and controls used for, the manufacture, processing, and packing of the drug; (v) any samples of the drug and of the articles used as components of it that the director of health may require; and (vi) specimens of the labeling proposed to be used for the drug.

An application provided for in subdivision (a)(2) of this section shall become effective on the sixtieth (60th) day after the filing of it, except that if the director of health finds after due notice to the applicant and giving the applicant an opportunity for a hearing that the drug is not safe for use under the conditions prescribed, recommended, or suggested in its proposed labeling, the director shall, prior to the effective date of the application, issue an order refusing to permit the application to become effective.

This section shall not apply:

To a drug intended solely for investigational use by experts qualified by scientific training and experience to investigate the safety in drugs provided the drug is plainly labeled “For investigational use only”;

To a drug sold in this state at any time prior to the enactment of this chapter or introduced into interstate commerce at any time prior to the enactment of the Federal Act; or

To any drug licensed under 42 U.S.C. § 262.

An order refusing to permit an application under this section to become effective may be revoked by the director of health.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 56, § 1.

21-31-16.1.
Substitution of generic drugs and biological products.

Drug product selection. The director shall permit substitution of less expensive generic, chemical, or brand-name drugs and pharmaceuticals, excluding biological products, considered by the director as therapeutically equivalent and interchangeable with specific, brand-name drugs and pharmaceuticals, if they are found to be in compliance with §

21-31-16

and standards set forth by the United States Food and Drug Administration under §§ 505 and 507 of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. §§ 355 and 357. The director shall consider, but not be limited to, the determination of the United States Food and Drug Administration, or its successor agency, as published under §§ 505 and 507 of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act. The director shall provide for the distribution of copies of lists of prescription drug products that the director deems, after evaluation, not to be therapeutically equivalent, and revisions to the lists, among physicians and pharmacists licensed and actively engaged in practice within the state, and other appropriate individuals, and shall supply a copy to any person on request. The list shall be revised from time to time so as to include new, pertinent information on approved prescription-drug products, reflecting current information as to standards for quality, safety, effectiveness, and therapeutic equivalence.

Appropriations. The director shall provide necessary space, personnel, and material to carry out the provisions of this section.

Liability. There shall be no civil liability incurred, and no cause of action of any nature shall arise, against the director, designated agents, or employees, as a result of the listing or omission of drugs or pharmaceuticals or biological products for product selection.

Annual reports. The director shall make annual reports to the general assembly by February 10 of each year showing a list of approved prescription-drug products with therapeutic equivalence and approved prescription interchangeable biological products, and an estimate of the average savings to the general public.

Pharmacists. When a pharmacist dispenses a therapeutically equivalent drug product or interchangeable biological product, there shall be no additional liability imposed on the prescriber who authorizes that product selection, or on the pharmacist dispensing the product selection from a physician’s oral or written order.

Enforcement provisions. It is made the duty of the department of health, its agents designated by the director of health, and of all peace officers within the state to enforce all provisions of this section and of §§

5-19.1-19

,

5-37-18

—

5-37-18

.2, and

21-31-3

.

Biological-product selection. The director shall permit substitution of a less-expensive biological product, as defined in §

5-19.1-2

, for a prescribed biological product only if said less-expensive biological product is an interchangeable biological product as defined in §

5-19.1-2

. The director shall maintain on the Rhode Island state department of health website, a link to the current list of each biological product determined by the United States Food and Drug Administration to be an interchangeable biological product.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 88, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 178, § 3; P.L. 2016, ch. 193, § 3.

21-31-17.
Adulterated cosmetics.

A cosmetic shall be deemed to be adulterated:

If it bears or contains any poisonous or deleterious substance which may render it injurious to users under the conditions of use prescribed in its labeling or advertisement, or under any conditions of use that are customary or usual; provided, that this provision shall not apply to coal tar hair dye, the label of which bears the following legend conspicuously displayed on it: “Caution — This product contains ingredients which may cause skin irritation on certain individuals and a preliminary test according to accompanying directions should first be made. This product must not be used for dyeing the eyelashes or eyebrows; to do so may cause blindness,” and the labeling of which bears adequate directions for that preliminary testing. For the purpose of this subdivision and subdivision (5) of this section the term “hair dye” does not include eyelash dyes or eyebrow dyes.

If it consists in whole or in part of any filthy, putrid, or decomposed substance.

If it has been produced, prepared, packed, or held under unsanitary conditions by which it may have become contaminated with filth, or by which it may have been rendered injurious to health.

If its container is composed, in whole or in part, of any poisonous or deleterious substance which may render the contents injurious to health.

If it is not a hair dye and it bears or contains a coal tar color other than one from a batch that has been certified under authority of the Federal Act.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 56, § 1.

21-31-18.
Misbranded cosmetics.

A cosmetic shall be deemed to be misbranded:

If its labeling is false or misleading in any way.

If in package form unless it bears a label containing: (i) the name and place of business of the manufacturer, packer, or distributor; and (ii) an accurate statement of the quantity of the contents in terms of weight, measure, or numerical count; provided, that under paragraph (ii) of this subdivision reasonable variations shall be permitted, and exemptions as to small packages shall be established by regulations prescribed by the director of health.

If any word, statement, or other information required by or under authority of this chapter to appear on the label or labeling is not prominently placed on it with such conspicuousness (as compared with other words, statements, designs, or devices in the labeling) and in such terms as to render it likely to be read and understood by the ordinary individual under customary conditions of purchase and use.

If its container is made, formed, or filled as to be misleading.

If its packaging or labeling is in violation of an applicable regulation issued pursuant to §

23-24.1-3

or

23-24.1-4

of the Poison Prevention Packaging Act.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 56, § 1; P.L. 1977, ch. 90, § 4.

21-31-19.
False advertising.

An advertisement of a food, drug, device, or cosmetic shall be deemed to be false if it is false or misleading in any particular.

For the purpose of this chapter the advertisement of a drug or device representing it to have any effect in albuminuria, appendicitis, arteriosclerosis, blood poison, bone disease, Bright’s disease, cancer, carbuncles, cholecystitis, diabetes, diphtheria, dropsy, erysipelas, gallstones, heart and vascular diseases, high blood pressure, mastoiditis, measles, meningitis, mumps, nephritis, otitis media, paralysis, pneumonia, poliomyelitis (infantile paralysis), prostate gland disorders, pyelitis, scarlet fever, sexual impotence, sinus infection, smallpox, tuberculosis, tumors, typhoid, uremia, or venereal disease shall also be deemed to be false, except that no advertisement not in violation of subsection (a) of this section shall be deemed to be false under this subsection if it is disseminated only to members of the medical, dental, or veterinary professions, or appears only in the scientific periodicals of these professions, or is disseminated only for the purpose of public health education by persons not commercially interested, directly or indirectly, in the sale of the drugs or devices; provided, that whenever the director of health determines that an advance in medical science has made any type of self-medication safe as to any of the diseases named in this subsection, the director of health shall by regulation authorize the advertisement of drugs having curative or therapeutic effect for that disease, subject to any conditions and restrictions that the director of health may deem necessary in the interests of public health; provided, that this subsection shall not be construed as indicating that self-medication for diseases other than those named in this section is safe and efficacious.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, § 1.

21-31-20.
Regulations promulgated by director — Hearing — Notice.

The authority to promulgate regulations for the efficient enforcement of this chapter is vested in the director of health. The director of health is authorized to make the regulations promulgated under this chapter conform, insofar as practicable, with those promulgated under the federal act.

Hearings authorized or required by this chapter shall be conducted by the director of health or any officer, agent, or employee that the director of health may designate for the purpose.

Before promulgating any regulations contemplated by §

21-31-9

,

21-31-11(10)

,

21-31-12

,

21-31-15(a)(4)

, (6), (7), (8) and (11), or

21-31-19(b)

, the director of health shall give appropriate notice of the proposal and of the time and place for a hearing. The regulation promulgated shall become effective on a date fixed by the director of health (which date shall not be prior to thirty (30) days after its promulgation). The regulation may be amended or repealed in the same manner as is provided for its adoption, except that in the case of a regulation amending or repealing any regulation the director of health, to the extent that the director deems necessary in order to prevent undue hardship, may disregard the provisions regarding notice, hearing, or effective date in this subsection.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 56, § 1.

21-31-21.
Inspection of establishments.

The director of health or the director’s duly authorized agent shall have free access at all reasonable hours to any factory, warehouse, or other establishment, except as otherwise provided in subsection (b), in which foods, drugs, devices, or cosmetics are manufactured, processed, packed, or held for introduction into commerce, or to enter any vehicle being used to transport or hold the foods, drugs, devices, or cosmetics in commerce, for the purpose:

Of inspecting the factory, warehouse, establishment, or vehicle to determine if any of the provisions of this chapter are being violated; and

To secure samples or specimens of any food, drug, device, or cosmetic after paying or offering to pay for the sample. It shall be the duty of the director of health to make or cause to be made examinations of samples secured under the provisions of this section to determine whether or not any provision of this chapter is being violated.

The director of health, the members of the state board of pharmacy, and the pharmacy inspectors and the narcotics inspectors in the department of health shall make the inspections and secure the samples of specimens and enforce the provisions of this chapter as the chapter applies to pharmacies.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 56, § 1; P.L. 1969, ch. 118, § 7.

21-31-22.
Publication of court orders, judgments and decrees — Dissemination of information.

The director of health may cause to be published from time to time reports summarizing all judgments, decrees, and court orders which have been rendered under this chapter, including the nature of the charge and its disposition.

The director of health may also cause to be disseminated any information regarding food, drugs, devices, and cosmetics that the director of health deems necessary in the interest of public health and the protection of the consumer against fraud. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the director of health from collecting, reporting, and illustrating the results of the investigations of the director of health.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 56, § 1.

21-31-23.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter is declared unconstitutional or the applicability of this chapter to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the constitutionality of the remainder of the chapter and the applicability of it to other persons and circumstances shall not be affected by that invalidity.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 56, § 1.

21-31-24.
Drug disposal.

Notwithstanding any provisions of the general or public laws to the contrary, any city or town may authorize the use of its police department to display a container suitable for use as a receptacle for used, expired, or unwanted drugs or drug products. The receptacle shall only permit the deposit of items, and the contents shall be locked and secured. The container shall be accessible to the public and shall have posted clearly legible signage indicating that expired or unwanted drugs or drug products may be disposed of in the receptacle.

The used, expired, or unwanted drugs or drug products disposed of under this section shall not include any controlled substance, as defined in §

21-28-2.08

, except as permitted under federal law.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 87, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 98, § 1.